Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 23
VOCATIONAL REHABILITATION — FEDERAL AID

Section.

33-2301. Acceptance of federal acts.

The state of Idaho hereby renews its acceptance of the provisions and benefits of the act of Congress, entitled “An act to provide for the promotion of vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, other than those who are legally blind, and their return to employment,” and further accepts “The Rehabilitation Act of 1973,” P.L. 93-112, 93rd Congress, as amended by the “Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014,” P.L. 113-128, 113th Congress, and all subsequent amendments thereto, and will observe and comply with all requirements of such acts.

33-2302. Custody and disbursement of funds.

The state treasurer is hereby designated and appointed custodian of all moneys received by the state from appropriations made by the congress of the United States for the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, other than those who are legally blind, and is authorized to receive and provide for the proper custody of the same and to make disbursements therefrom upon the order of the state board herein designated.

33-2303. Powers of board in carrying out provisions.

The board heretofore designated as the state board for career technical education is hereby designated as the state board for the purpose of providing for the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, other than those who are legally blind, and is empowered and directed to cooperate in the administration of said act of congress; to prescribe and provide such courses of vocational services as may be necessary for the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, other than those who are legally blind, and provide for the supervision of such services; to appoint such assistants as may be necessary to administer this act and said act of congress in this state; to fix the compensation of such assistants and to direct the disbursement and administer the use of all funds provided by the federal government and the state of Idaho for the vocational rehabilitation of such persons.

In order to provide vocational rehabilitation services, the board for career technical education may enter into, or authorize a state vocational rehabilitation agency over which it has oversight to enter into, agreements with any person, corporation or association, approved by the board for career technical education to provide such services.

Any person, corporation or association may make application to the board for career technical education for approval and certification to provide vocational rehabilitation services. The board for career technical education may either grant or deny certification or revoke certification previously granted after investigation of the applicant, in accordance with standards as set forth in rules promulgated by the board for career technical education, and consistent with national accreditation bodies. The board for career technical education may authorize a state vocational rehabilitation agency over which it has oversight to provide the approvals or certifications described in this subsection.

33-2304. Plan of cooperation.

It shall be the duty of the state board empowered to cooperate as aforesaid with the appropriate state agencies to formulate a plan of cooperation in accordance with the provisions of this act and said act of Congress.

33-2305. Gifts and donations — Receipt and disposition.

The state board designated to cooperate as aforesaid in the administration of the federal act, is hereby authorized and empowered to receive such gifts and donations, either from public or private sources, as may be offered unconditionally or under such conditions related to the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, other than those who are legally blind, as in the judgment of the state board are proper and consistent with the provisions of sections 33-2301 through 33-2306, Idaho Code. All the moneys received as gifts or donations shall be deposited in the state treasury and shall constitute a permanent fund to be called the special fund for the vocational rehabilitation of disabled persons, to be used by the said board to defray the expenses of vocational rehabilitation in special cases, including the payment of necessary expenses of persons undergoing services. A full report of all gifts and donations offered and accepted, together with the names of the donors and the respective amounts contributed by each, and all disbursements therefrom shall be submitted annually to the governor of the state and to the governor and legislature biennially by the state board.

33-2306. Report of state board.

The state board for career technical education shall make annually to the governor and legislature a report of all moneys expended for the vocational rehabilitation of persons with disabilities, other than those who are legally blind, both from state and federal funds, and shall include such annual report in the annual report of the state board of education.

33-2307. Terminating financial assistance for persons suffering from renal diseases

Legislative intent. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

33-2308. Termination of vocational rehabilitation program to provide treatment to persons suffering from chronic renal diseases. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 4, effective July 1, 2013.